Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Article 1. Pat Harrison Waterway Commission.

§ 51-15-1.
Membership and organization of board.

There is hereby created the Pat Harrison Waterway Commission composed of Clarke, Covington, Forrest, George, Greene, Jackson, Jasper, Jones, Lamar, Lauderdale, Newton, Perry, Smith, Stone, and Wayne Counties in the State of Mississippi, to be governed by a board consisting of one member from each such county and three members from the state at large, all to be appointed by the governor to serve for a term of four years or until their successors are appointed and qualified. The governor shall designate in his appointment the chairman and vice-chairman thereof. They shall serve without pay except for their actual traveling expenses and other necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties, to be reimbursed as in the case of state employees under the provisions of general law. Upon appointment, said members shall meet and organize at Hattiesburg, Mississippi, and set a regular time and place for the meetings of the commission, secure offices and all necessary equipment, and obtain such engineering, professional, clerical, and other assistance as may be necessary in order to accomplish the purposes of this article. An executive director may be appointed by the board if this is deemed advisable, and salaries of all personnel may be paid out of funds provided under the terms of this article in an amount agreeable to the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-43; Laws, 1956, ch. 168, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 223, eff from and after passage (approved May 31, 1962).

§ 51-15-3.
Powers and duties.

The Pat Harrison Waterway Commission is hereby authorized and empowered to do any and all things necessary and desirable in making a survey or surveys of the Pascagoula, Leaf, and Chickasawhay Rivers, the Tallahala Creek, and their tributaries in co-operation with the federal government and other agencies of the State of Mississippi; to promote the establishment of barge canals linking the cities of Meridian, Hattiesburg, Laurel, and other cities and communities along the Pascagoula, Leaf, and Chickasawhay Rivers, the Tallahala Creek, and their tributaries with the Gulf of Mexico. Each county represented on said commission, or two or more such counties acting in concert, pursuant to a plan to be approved by said commission, are authorized to improve all or any part of such waterways within said county or counties for navigation or flood control purposes.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-43; Laws, 1956, ch. 168, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 223, eff from and after passage (approved May 31, 1962).

§ 51-15-5.
Financing.

The commission shall be financed in all of its activities from funds made available by each of the associated counties, and each such county is authorized and empowered to contribute any amount or amounts which the board of supervisors thereof shall deem advisable, acting in their sole discretion, to be paid from the general county fund of the respective counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-43; Laws, 1956, ch. 168, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 223; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 37, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 51-15-7.
Homestead exemption laws not applicable.

No reimbursement on the additional tax levies herein provided shall be made under the Homestead Exemption Law of 1946, being Sections 27-33-1 through 27-33-61 of the Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-43; Laws, 1956, ch. 168, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 223, eff from and after passage (approved May 31, 1962).

§ 51-15-9.
Article supplementary to other laws.

This article shall be considered supplemental and additional to any and all other laws, and confers sufficient authority in and of itself for the purposes set forth herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5956-43; Laws, 1956, ch. 168, §§ 1-5; Laws, 1962, ch. 223, eff from and after passage (approved May 31, 1962).